Nevada, session 83, SB228.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Alliance for Childhood Diseases, doing
business as the Cure 4 The Kids Foundation:
(a) The sum of $7,000,000 to:
(1) Build and upgrade infrastructure and acquire equipment
and supplies as necessary to establish and operate a Pediatric Stem
Cell and Bone Marrow Transplant Program in this State; and
(2) Apply to the Foundation for the Accreditation of Cellular
Therapy for the accreditation of the Pediatric Stem Cell and Bone
Marrow Transplant Program in this State.
(b) The sum of $2,500,000 for all costs related to conducting the
first five bone marrow transplant operations, including, without
limitation, costs incurred in conducting pre-transplant evaluations,
searching for donors, hospitalization, supplying and administering
medications and providing follow-up care, for the purpose of
obtaining the accreditation described in subparagraph (2) of
paragraph (a).
2. Any remaining balance of an appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Alliance for Childhood Diseases, doing
business as the Cure 4 The Kids Foundation, for the costs of
operating a Pediatric Stem Cell and Bone Marrow Transplant
Program in this State, including, without limitation, the costs of
recruiting, salaries, benefits and training for providers of health care,
providers of support services and other staff and the payment of
administrative costs, the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $3,500,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $3,000,000
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
-
*SB228*

– 3 –
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred,
and must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 3. Upon acceptance of the money appropriated by
sections 1 and 2 of this act, the Alliance for Childhood Diseases,
doing business as the Cure 4 The Kids Foundation, agrees to:
1. Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before December 18, 2026, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by sections 1 and 2
of this act from the date on which the money was received by the
Alliance for Childhood Diseases through December 1, 2026;
2. Prepare and transmit a final report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before September 17, 2027, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by sections 1 and 2
of this act from the date on which the money was received by the
Alliance for Childhood Diseases through June 30, 2027; and
3. Upon request of the Legislative Commission, make available
to the Legislative Auditor any of the books, accounts, claims,
reports, vouchers or other records of information, confidential or
otherwise, of the Alliance for Childhood Diseases, regardless of
their form or location, that the Legislative Auditor deems necessary
to conduct an audit of the use of the money appropriated pursuant to
sections 1 and 2 of this act.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB228*